Mississippi statutes. Title 17. Local Government; Provisions Common to Counties and Municipalities
Chapter 11. Gulf Regional District Law
§ 17-11-55.
Suits involving district and associated members.

The district and all associated members thereof shall be vested with the power to enforce in chancery court by mandamus, in addition to the equitable remedies available in such courts, all legal rights or rights of action of the district or associated county or city with any public agency, corporation, or person, and for such purpose may sue, be sued, plead and be impleaded in the chancery court of any county in the district having jurisdiction of the subject matter of any such suit. In cases where the chancery court of more than one county may have jurisdiction of the subject matter of any action, the chancery court of either county may exercise exclusive jurisdiction and all parties having an interest therein shall be made parties to the proceedings.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 9054-67; Laws, 1971, ch. 517, § 17; Laws, 1991, ch. 573, § 105, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§ 17-11-57.
Appeals.

Any person aggrieved by a judgment or decision of the governing body of the district or of an associated county or city involved in an approved project, may appeal therefrom within ten days from the date thereof to the chancery court of any county within the district having jurisdiction of the subject matter, and may embody the facts, judgment and decision in a bill of exceptions which shall be signed by the persons acting as chairman or the presiding officer of the county or city or the governing body of the district. The executive director of the district or the clerk of such county or city shall transmit the bill of exceptions to the chancery court at once and the court shall either in term time or vacation hear and determine the same on the case as presented by the bill of exceptions as an appellate court, and shall affirm or reverse the judgment. If the judgment be reversed, the chancery court shall render such judgment as should have been rendered, and certify the same to the district or county or city, and costs shall be awarded as in other cases. The district or any associated member thereof may employ counsel to defend such appeals or defend or prosecute any suit, to be paid out of the funds of the district or such county or city. Any such appeal may be heard and determined in vacation in the discretion of the court on motion of any party and written notice for ten days to the other party or parties or the attorney of record, and the hearing of same shall be held in the county where the suit is pending, unless the judge in his order shall otherwise direct.

No appeals shall be taken from any order relating to or authorizing the issuance of bonds; these matters shall be heard in the manner provided by Section 17-11-51.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 9054-67; Laws, 1971, ch. 517, § 17, eff from and after passage (approved April 14, 1971).

§ 17-11-59.
Limitations.

Notwithstanding the powers and authority conferred on the district by this chapter, it is not the intent of this chapter to limit, abridge, restrict, or curtail any existing power granted to any municipality by law, but to provide a vehicle through which municipalities may more effectively perform their governmental and corporate functions, and the provisions of this chapter shall be cumulative, additional, and supplemental. Notwithstanding provisions of this chapter to the contrary, a municipality shall not be required to secure the approval by the district of any feasibility study, plans, or projects which the municipality may elect to undertake separately. Wherever any public agencies are now authorized to join with other municipalities, and undertake projects, then such municipalities may elect to proceed under such general laws, or may elect to come within the provisions of this chapter. Notwithstanding any regulation or requirement of any federal agency to the contrary, the governing body of the district shall not act for or on behalf of any public agency of the district in its dealings with such federal agency without the express consent of the public agency involved. It is the intent of this chapter that the governing body of the district shall not be vested with any governmental powers or functions other than those voluntarily conferred upon it by public agencies in the manner provided in this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 9054-68; Laws, 1971, ch. 517, § 18, eff from and after passage (approved April 14, 1971).

§ 17-11-61.
Amendments to chapter.

This chapter shall never be amended unless this chapter is brought forward in its entirety.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 9054-70; Laws, 1971, ch. 517, § 20, eff from and after passage (approved April 14, 1971).